California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
 to a medical institution or nursing facility on or after January 1, 1990.

(e) “Medical institution” has the same meaning as defined in Section 435.1010 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(f) “Nursing facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 367, Sec. 7.   (AB 574)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

The Governor may enter into and execute in behalf of the state all necessary agreements in connection with this chapter as may be required by the United States government.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, 2nd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

If any individual in good faith adheres to the teachings of any bona fide church, sect, denomination, or organization, and in accordance with its principles depends for healing entirely upon prayer or spiritual means, no medical examination shall be required to receive health care authorized by this chapter, but in lieu thereof the certificate of a practitioner of such bona fide sect, denomination, or organization approved and authorized by the department, shall be accepted as to the need of such individual for service. No rule or regulation shall be adopted or continued in force which discriminates against such an individual.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.

(a) The health care benefits and services specified in this chapter, to the extent that such services are neither provided under any other federal or state law nor provided nor available under other contractual or legal entitlements of the person, shall be provided under this chapter to any person who is a resident of this state and is made eligible by the provisions of this article. It is the intent of the Legislature that a provider shall look to such other contractual or legal entitlements for payment before submitting a bill for payment
 under this chapter.

(b) Any applicant for, or recipient of, Medi-Cal benefits who requests medical assistance for home and facility care shall meet the specific eligibility requirements for the receipt of medical assistance for home and facility care set forth in this chapter.

(c) This section shall be implemented pursuant to the requirements of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.), and any regulations adopted pursuant to that act, and only to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(d) To the extent that regulations are necessary to implement this section, the department shall promulgate regulations using the nonemergency regulatory process described in Article 5 (commencing with Section 11346) of Chapter 3.5 of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government
 Code.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this section shall apply prospectively to any individual to whom the act applies commencing from the date regulations adopted pursuant to this act are filed with the Secretary of State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 379, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.1.

Except for adults receiving aid pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) and for whom federal financial participation would not be obtainable for their medical costs under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act, categorically needy persons are eligible for health care services under Section 14005.

Eligibility for health care services under Section 14005 shall continue for four calendar months beginning with the month in which a family becomes ineligible for benefits under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program, if all of the following apply:

(a) The ineligibility is due wholly or partly to the collection or increased collection of child or spousal support pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 11475) of Chapter 2.

(b) The family has received benefits under the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program in at least three of the six months immediately preceding the month in which ineligibility begins.

(c) Ineligibility occurred after October 1, 1984, and before October 1, 1988.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1089, Sec. 3.   Effective September 24, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.2.

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, the eligibility of a person eligible under the Cuban-Haitian Entrant Program or the Refugee Resettlement Program for health care services under Section 14005 shall be determined by applying the same income and resource methodologies and standards and all other eligibility criteria established pursuant to this chapter that are applied by the department in determining the eligibility of a medically needy family person, except for those criteria that establish categorical relatedness, and only as long as federal funds are
 available. Victims of trafficking, domestic violence, and other serious crimes, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 18945, shall be eligible for these services to the same extent as individuals who are admitted to the United States as a refugee under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code. Services under this subdivision shall be paid from state funds to the extent federal funding is unavailable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 672, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, any person who: (1) Was once determined to be disabled in accordance with Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Section 1382c, Title 42, United States Code), and (2) Became ineligible for benefits pursuant to Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act (Section 1382c, Title 42, United States Code) because the person engaged in substantial
 gainful activity, and (3) Continues to suffer from the physical or mental impairments which were the basis of the disability determination required under paragraph (1), shall be considered to be disabled, for the purposes of this chapter, even though such person is engaged in substantial gainful activity. Regardless of whether such person has excess income pursuant to Sections 14005.12 and 14005.13, such person shall be eligible to receive health care benefits and services under this chapter if his or her income does not exceed the maximum income eligibility limits for benefits under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act. Any such person whose income exceeds the maximum income eligibility limits for benefits under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act shall be eligible under Sections 14005.4 and 14052 for health care
 benefits and services under this chapter, provided, that the income levels for maintenance in Section 14005.12 for such person shall be the maximum income eligibility limits for benefits under Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act and provided, that his or her nonexempt income in excess of that maximum is used to pay his or her share of costs.

(b) For purposes of this section, “substantial gainful activity” means work activity considered to be substantial gainful activity under applicable federal regulations adopted pursuant to Section 1614 of Part A of Title XVI of the Social Security Act.

(c) The determination of continued impairments and the need for health care benefits and services shall be supported by medical reports when requested. Such reports shall be provided at the expense of the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1156.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.4.

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, the eligibility of a state-only Medi-Cal person for health care services under Section 14005 shall be determined by applying the same income and resource methodologies and standards and all other eligibility criteria established pursuant to this chapter that are applied by the department in determining the eligibility of a medically needy family person except for those criteria that establish categorical relatedness.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1354, Sec. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.5.

(a) In determining eligibility pursuant to Section 14005.4 or 14005.7, reparation or restitution payments received by victims of the Nazi persecution from the Federal Republic of Germany pursuant to the Federal Law on the Compensation of Victims of the National Socialist Persecution (Federal Compensation Law), as enacted by that government on June 29, 1956, shall not be deemed as available income, nor shall any accumulation of those payments be considered an available resource, to the extent that the funds are not spent and are kept identifiable.

(b) The director shall
 seek federal waivers from the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services, in order to ensure federal financial participation. In the event of an initial determination by the Secretary of the United States Department of Health and Human Services that any provision of this section is in conflict with any federal statute or regulation, the department shall take all available and necessary steps to obtain a final determination reversing that decision. In the event that a final determination is made which finds a conflict with federal law, the director shall immediately request the Attorney General to seek judicial review of the determination, and the director shall notify the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature of its request. Notwithstanding the outcome of the director’s efforts to obtain waivers under this subdivision, or a final judicial decision holding that any provision of this section is in conflict with federal law, subdivision (a) shall
 be implemented on July 1, 1985, or the date upon which waivers are obtained under this subdivision, whichever is earlier. Failure to obtain waivers pursuant to this subdivision shall not affect implementation of subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 621, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.6.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(1) Under federal law, minors living at home with their families may not be eligible for the SSI and Medicaid programs.

(2) Under the Federal Budget Reconciliation Act of 1981, however, states may apply for a Section 1915(c) waiver to allow a person to be eligible for SSI and Medicaid when medical and social services provided in the home can be shown to be less
 costly than services provided in an institution.

(3) Whenever possible, medical and social services should be provided in the least restrictive setting and at the lowest cost to the programs involved.

(4) The State Department of Health Services has already successfully applied for the Section 1915(c) waiver as applied to certain defined populations of developmentally disabled, elderly, and medically acute clients.

(b) The State Director of Health Services shall apply for additional waivers when appropriate to expand the number and types of persons who will be eligible for in-home services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 237.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.60.

(a) Commencing January 1, 2014, the department shall provide Medi-Cal benefits for individuals who meet eligibility requirements of Section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII)).

(b) An individual eligible under this section shall not have income that exceeds 133 percent of the federal poverty level as determined, counted, and
 valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148), and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(c) (1) Individuals who are eligible under this section shall be required to mandatorily enroll into a Medi-Cal managed care health plan in those counties where a Medi-Cal managed care health plan is available.

(2) (A) Individuals residing in a county where no Medi-Cal managed care health plan is available shall be provided services under the Medi-Cal fee-for-service delivery system subject to subparagraph (B).

(B) If a Medi-Cal managed care health
 plan becomes available to individuals referenced in subparagraph (A), those individuals shall be enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan.

(d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been
 adopted.

(e) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 9.   (AB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.61.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (e), individuals who are enrolled in a Low Income Health Program (LIHP) as of December 31, 2013, under California’s Bridge to Reform Section 1115(a) Medicaid Demonstration who are at or below 133 percent of the federal poverty level shall be transitioned directly to the Medi-Cal program in accordance with the requirements of this section and pursuant to federal
 approval.

(b) Except as provided in paragraph (8) of subdivision (c), individuals who are eligible under subdivision (a) shall be required to enroll into Medi-Cal managed care health plans.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (d), with respect to managed care health plan enrollment, a LIHP enrollee shall be notified by the department at least 60 days prior to January 1, 2014, in accordance with the department’s LIHP transition plan of all of the following:

(1) Which Medi-Cal managed care health plan or plans contain his or her existing primary care provider, if the department has this information and the primary care provider is contracted with a Medi-Cal managed care health plan.

(2) That the LIHP enrollee, subject to his or her ability to change as
 described in paragraph (3), will be assigned to a health plan that includes his or her primary care provider and enrolled effective January 1, 2014. If the enrollee wants to keep his or her primary care provider, no additional action will be required if the primary care provider is contracted with a Medi-Cal managed care health plan.

(3) That the LIHP enrollee may choose any available Medi-Cal managed care health plan and primary care provider in his or her county of residence prior to January 1, 2014, if more than one such plan is available in the county where he or she resides, and he or she will receive all provider and health plan information required to be sent to new enrollees and instructions on how to choose or change his or her health plan and primary care provider.

(4) That in counties with more than one Medi-Cal managed care health plan, if the LIHP enrollee does not
 affirmatively choose a plan within 30 days of receipt of the notice, he or she shall be enrolled into the Medi-Cal managed care health plan that contains his or her LIHP primary care provider as part of the Medi-Cal managed care contracted primary care network, if the department has this information about the primary care provider, and the primary care provider is contracted with a Medi-Cal managed care health plan. If the primary care provider is contracted with more than one Medi-Cal managed care health plan, then the LIHP enrollee will be assigned to one of the health plans containing his or her primary care provider in accordance with an assignment process established to ensure the linkage.

(5) That if the LIHP enrollee’s existing primary care provider is not contracted with any Medi-Cal managed care health plan, then he or she will receive all provider and health plan information required to be sent to new enrollees. If the LIHP enrollee
 does not affirmatively select one of the available Medi-Cal managed care plans within 30 days of receipt of the notice, he or she will automatically be assigned a plan through the department-prescribed auto-assignment process.

(6) That the LIHP enrollee does not need to take any action to be transitioned to the Medi-Cal program or to retain his or her primary care provider, if the primary care provider is available pursuant to paragraph (2).

(7) That the LIHP enrollee may choose not to transition to the Medi-Cal program, and what this choice will mean for his or her health care coverage and access to health care services.

(8) That in counties where no Medi-Cal managed care health plans are available, the LIHP enrollee will be transitioned into fee-for-service Medi-Cal, and provided with all information that is
 required to be sent to new Medi-Cal enrollees including the assistance telephone number for fee-for-service beneficiaries, and that, if a Medi-Cal managed care health plan becomes available in the residence county, he or she will be enrolled in a Medi-Cal managed care health plan according to the enrollment procedures in place at that time.

(d) Individuals who qualify under subdivision (a) who apply and are determined eligible for LIHP after the date identified by the department that is not later than October 1, 2013, will be considered late enrollees. Late enrollees shall be notified in accordance with subdivision (c), except according to a different timeframe, but will transition to Medi-Cal coverage on January 1, 2014. Late enrollees after the date identified in this subdivision shall be transitioned pursuant to the department’s LIHP transition plan process.

(e) Individuals who
 qualify under subdivision (a) and are not denoted as active LIHP enrollees according to the Medi-Cal Eligibility Data System at any point within the date range identified by the department that will start not sooner than December 20, 2013, and continue through December 31, 2013, will not be included in the LIHP transition to the Medi-Cal program. These individuals may apply for Medi-Cal eligibility separately from the LIHP transition process.

(f) In conformity with the department’s transition plan, individuals who are enrolled in a LIHP at any point from September 2013 through December 2013, under California’s Bridge to Reform Section 1115(a) Medicaid Demonstration and are above 133 percent of the federal poverty level will be provided information regarding how to apply for an eligibility determination for an insurance affordability program, including submission of an application by telephone, by mail, online, or in person.

(g) A Medi-Cal managed care health plan that receives a LIHP enrollee during this transition shall assign the LIHP primary care provider of the enrollee as the Medi-Cal managed care health plan primary care provider of the enrollee, to the extent possible, if the Medi-Cal managed care health plan contracts with that primary care provider, unless the beneficiary has chosen another primary care provider on his or her choice form. A LIHP enrollee who is enrolled into a Medi-Cal managed care plan may work through the Medi-Cal managed care plan to change his or her assigned primary care provider or other provider, after enrollment and subject to provider availability, according to the standard processes that are currently available in Medi-Cal managed care for selecting providers.

(h) The director may, with federal approval, suspend, delay, or otherwise modify the requirement for LIHP
 program eligibility redeterminations in 2013 to facilitate the process of transitioning LIHP enrollees to other health coverage in 2014.

(i) The county LIHPs and their designees shall work with the department and its designees during the 2013 and 2014 calendar years to facilitate continuity of care and data sharing for the purposes of delivering Medi-Cal services in the 2014 calendar year.

(j) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation under Title XIX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396 et seq.) is available and all necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 3, Sec. 10) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 442, Sec. 8.   (SB 28)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.62.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for an applicant or beneficiary whose eligibility is not determined using the modified adjusted gross income (MAGI)-based financial methods, as specified in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the department shall seek federal approval to implement a disregard of one hundred thirty thousand dollars ($130,000) in nonexempt property for a case with one member and sixty-five thousand dollars ($65,000) for each additional household member, up to a maximum of 10 members.

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only after the director determines that systems have been programmed for the disregards specified in paragraph (1) and they communicate that determination in writing to the
 Department of Finance and no sooner than January 1, 2026.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of county letters, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action. Such instructions shall include a list of all exempt property for use until such time that regulations are adopted.

(2) Within two years of implementing the requirements set forth in this subdivision, the department shall do both of the following:

(A) Adopt, amend, or repeal regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and this
 section.

(B) Update its notices and forms to reflect the consideration of assets and resources as described in subdivision (a).

(c) Upon operation of subdivision (a), the department shall make available, on a quarterly basis data, the number of Medi-Cal enrollees who lost eligibility due to the asset limit. The department shall consult with stakeholders to determine the appropriate data elements and level of detail, including, but not limited to, the reasons for termination.

(d) This section shall only be implemented to the extent consistent with federal law, upon the department obtaining any necessary federal approvals, and to the extent federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(e) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 68.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 69 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.62.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for an applicant or beneficiary whose eligibility is not determined using the modified adjusted gross income (MAGI)-based financial methods, as specified in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, the department shall seek federal approval to implement a resource limit of twenty-one thousand dollars ($21,000) in nonexempt property for a household with one member, thirty-one thousand dollars ($31,000) in nonexempt property for a household with two members, and one thousand five hundred fifty dollars ($1,550) for each additional household member, up to a maximum of 10 members.

(2) This subdivision shall be implemented only after the director determines that systems
 have been programmed for the limits specified in paragraph (1) and they communicate that determination in writing to the Department of Finance, and no sooner than July 1, 2027.

(b) For beneficiaries enrolled as of the operative date of this section, subdivision (a) shall apply beginning with the beneficiary’s first annual redetermination conducted on or after the operative date of this section.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement this section by means of county letters, provider bulletins or notices, policy letters, or other similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(2) Within two years of implementing the requirements set forth in this section, the department
 shall do both of the following:

(A) Adopt, amend, or repeal regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and this section.

(B) Update its notices and forms to reflect the consideration of assets and resources as described in subdivision (a).

(d) Upon operation of subdivision (a), the department shall make available, on a quarterly basis data, the number of Medi-Cal enrollees who lost eligibility due to the asset limit. The department shall consult with stakeholders to determine the appropriate data elements and level of detail, including, but not limited to, the reasons for termination.

(e) This section shall only be implemented to the extent
 consistent with federal law, upon the department obtaining any necessary federal approvals, and to the extent federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is available and not otherwise jeopardized.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 68) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 27, Sec. 69.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2026.   Operative July 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.63.

(a) A person who wishes to apply for an insurance affordability program shall be allowed to file an application on his or her own behalf or on behalf of his or her family. Subject to the requirements of Section 14014.5, an individual also may be accompanied, assisted, and represented in the application and renewal process by an individual or organization of his or her own choice. If the individual, for any reason, is unable to apply or renew on his or her own
 behalf, any of the following persons may assist in the application process or during a renewal of eligibility:

(1) The individual’s guardian, conservator, a person authorized to make health care decisions on behalf of the individual pursuant to an advance health care directive, or executor or administrator of the individual’s estate.

(2) A public agency representative.

(3) The individual’s legal counsel, relative, friend, or other spokesperson of his or her choice.

(b) A person who wishes to challenge a decision concerning his or her eligibility for or receipt of benefits from an insurance affordability program has the right to represent himself or herself or use legal counsel, a relative, a friend, or other spokesperson of his or her choice subject to
 the requirements of Section 14014.5.

(c) To the extent otherwise required by Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department shall adopt emergency regulations implementing this section no later than July 1, 2015. The department may thereafter readopt the emergency regulations pursuant to that chapter. The adoption and readoption, by the department, of regulations implementing this section shall be deemed to be an emergency and necessary to avoid serious harm to the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted from the requirement that it describe facts showing the need for immediate action and from review by the Office of Administrative Law.

(d) This section shall be implemented on October 1, 2013, or
 when all necessary federal approvals have been obtained, whichever is later, and only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 11.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.64.

(a) Effective January 1, 2014, and notwithstanding any other law, when determining eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, an applicant’s or beneficiary’s income and resources shall be determined, counted, and valued in accordance with the requirements of Section 1902(e)(14) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(14)), as added by the ACA, which prohibits the use of an assets or resources test for individuals whose income eligibility is determined based on modified adjusted gross income.

(b) When determining the eligibility of applicants and beneficiaries using the MAGI-based financial methods, the 5-percent income disregard required under Section 1902(e)(14)(B)(I) of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1396a(e)(14)(B)(I)) shall be
 applied.

(c) (1) The department shall establish income eligibility thresholds for those Medi-Cal eligibility groups whose eligibility will be determined using MAGI-based financial methods. The income eligibility thresholds shall be developed using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code and in conformity with Section 1396a(gg) of Title 42 of the United States Code as added by the ACA.

(2) In utilizing state data or the national standard methodology with Survey of Income and Program Participation data to develop the converted modified adjusted gross income standard for Medi-Cal applicants and beneficiaries, the department shall ensure that the financial methodology used for identifying the equivalent income eligibility threshold preserves Medi-Cal eligibility for applicants and beneficiaries to the
 extent required by federal law. The department shall report to the Legislature on the expected changes in income eligibility thresholds using the chosen methodology for individuals whose income is determined on the basis of a converted dollar amount or federal poverty level percentage. The department shall convene stakeholders, including the Legislature, counties, and consumer advocates regarding the results of the converted standards and shall review with them the information used for the specific calculations before adopting its final methodology for the equivalent income eligibility threshold level.

(3) The income eligibility threshold levels required under this subdivision shall be as follows for the identified coverage groups:

(A) For those pregnant individuals and infants eligible under Sections 435.116 and 435.118 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations,
 respectively, 208 percent of the federal poverty level.

(B) For those children one to five years of age, inclusive, eligible under Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VI) of Title 42 of the United States Code, 142 percent of the federal poverty level.

(C) For those children 6 to 18 years of age, inclusive, eligible under Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VII) of Title 42 of the United States Code, 133 percent of the federal poverty level.

(d) The department shall include individuals under 19 years of age, or in the case of full-time students, under 21 years of age, in the household for purposes of determining eligibility under Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, as added by the ACA.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions
 shall apply:

(1) “ACA” means the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (Public Law 111-148) as originally enacted and as amended by the federal Health Care and Education Reconciliation Act of 2010 (Public Law 111-152) and any subsequent amendments.

(2) “MAGI-based financial methods” means income calculated using the financial methodologies described in Section 1396a(e)(14) of Title 42 of the United States Code, and as added by the ACA.

(f) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, shall implement, interpret, or make specific this section by means of all-county letters, plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions until the time regulations are
 adopted. Thereafter, the department shall adopt regulations in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Beginning six months after the effective date of this section, and notwithstanding Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, the department shall provide a status report to the Legislature on a semiannual basis until regulations have been adopted.

(g) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 47, Sec. 81.   (SB 184)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.65.

(a) The department shall file a state plan amendment to exercise the federal option under subdivision (h) of Section 435.603 of Title 42 of the Code of Federal Regulations to allow beneficiaries to use projected annual household income and to allow applicants and beneficiaries to use reasonably predictable annual income as set forth in this section when determining their eligibility for Medi-Cal
 benefits.

(b) (1) Beneficiaries shall be allowed to use projected annual household income to establish eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits for the remainder of the calendar year in which that projected income is used to determine eligibility if the current monthly income would render the beneficiary ineligible due to an increase in income.

(2) If projected annual household income has been used by the beneficiary, the department shall redetermine the beneficiary’s Medi-Cal benefits at the end of the calendar year.

(c) (1) Applicants and beneficiaries shall be allowed to use reasonably predictable annual income to establish eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits.

(2) Before being allowed to use reasonably predictable
 annual income to establish eligibility for Medi-Cal benefits, the applicant or beneficiary shall provide the department with adequate evidence of the predicted change, including, but not limited to, a signed contract for employment, clear proof of a history of predictable fluctuations in income, or other clear indicia of such future changes in income.

(d) This section shall be implemented only if and to the extent that federal financial participation is available and any necessary federal approvals have been obtained.

(e) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2014.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 194.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.66.

The department shall seek any federal waivers necessary to use the eligibility information of individuals who have been determined eligible for the CalFresh program under Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 18900) of Part 6, and who are under 65 years of age and are not disabled, to determine their Medi-Cal eligibility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 13.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.67.

The department shall seek any federal waivers necessary to automatically enroll parents in the Medi-Cal program who apply for Medi-Cal benefits and have one or more children who are eligible for Medi-Cal benefits based upon a determined income level that is at or below the applicable income standard for eligibility under Section 14005.60.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 14.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.68.

The department may seek any federal waivers or state plan amendments necessary to use the eligibility information of individuals determined eligible for other state-only funded health care programs and county general assistance programs to determine an applicant’s Medi-Cal eligibility to the extent that there is no General Fund impact.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, 1st Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 15.   (SB 1 1x)   Effective September 30, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

14005.69.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the department implement work or community engagement requirements set forth in Section 1396a(xx) of Title 42 of the United States Code (Section 71119 of federal H.R. 1 (Public Law 119-21)) to ensure that all eligible Medi-Cal applicants and beneficiaries obtain and maintain coverage in ways that are least administratively burdensome to applicants and beneficiaries.

(b) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Applicable individual” means an individual, other than a specified excluded individual as defined in paragraph (2), who is eligible to enroll, or is enrolled, in the Medi-Cal program and is any of the
 following:

(A) An individual whose Medi-Cal eligibility is pursuant to Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) An individual who receives state-funded Medi-Cal coverage and who meets the same criteria described in Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(C) An individual who has attained 19 years of age and is under 65 years of age, is not pregnant, and is not entitled to, or enrolled for, benefits under federal Medicare Part A (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395c et seq.), or eligible for, or enrolled for, benefits under federal Medicare Part B (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395j et seq.).

(2) “Specified excluded individual” means any of the following individuals, as determined in accordance with criteria
 established by federal regulation or directive from the federal Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services:

(A) An individual who is described in Section 1396a(a)(10)(A)(i)(IX) of Title 42 of the United States Code.

(B) An Indian or an Urban Indian, as defined in paragraphs (13) and (28) of Section 1603 of Title 25 of the United States Code, respectively.

(C) A California Indian, as described in Section 1679(a) of Title 25 of the United States Code.

(D) An individual who has otherwise been determined eligible as an Indian for the federal Indian Health Service under regulations promulgated by the United States Secretary of Health and Human Services.

(E) The parent, guardian, caretaker
 relative, or family caregiver of a dependent child 13 years of age or younger or a disabled individual.
